Utah statutes.
13-46-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Accessing agency" means:
(a)  the department;
(b)  the Department of Workforce Services;
(c)  the Labor Commission; and
(d)  the State Tax Commission.
(2)  "Council" means the Independent Contractor Enforcement Council created in
Section 13-46-201.
(3)  "Database" means the Independent Contractor Database created under this
chapter.
(4)  "Department" means the Department of Commerce.
